Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-1503.03
Executive director; employ personnel; employees; duties.

(1) The executive director of the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems shall employ qualified personnel as may be required to carry out the duties and responsibilities required under sections 84-1501 to 84-1513. Except for the personnel described in subsection (2) of this section, such employees shall be deemed state employees and covered by the State Personnel System pursuant to sections 81-1301 to 81-1368 and other personnel rules or regulations. The positions of the internal auditor and the attorney hired by the board pursuant to section 84-1503 shall be classified positions covered by the State Personnel System and shall not be noncovered positions under subsection (2) of section 81-1316.

(2) The executive director may hire assistant directors and deputies to assist the executive director in administering the Nebraska Public Employee Retirement Systems. Each assistant director and deputy shall be exempt from the State Personnel System and shall receive a salary as set by the executive director.

(3) The executive director shall be exempt from the State Personnel System.

(4) All employees shall comply with state accounting regulations and applicable state and federal laws in the discharge of their duties.

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 54;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 48;

Laws 2001, LB 408, § 30;

Laws 2005, LB 364, § 21;

Laws 2005, LB 503, § 21;

Laws 2006, LB 1019, § 19;

Laws 2024, LB198, § 21;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 48.
July 18, 2026